Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.93.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Borrower" means an eligible student who has received a student loan under the Washington student loan program.

(2) "Eligible expenses" means reasonable expenses associated with the costs of acquiring a postsecondary education such as tuition, fees, books, equipment, room and board, and other expenses as determined by the office.

(3) "Eligible graduate program" means an advanced academic degree in a specialized field of study that has a workforce shortage or is considered high demand including, but not limited to, professions in health care, behavioral and mental health, early education, K-12, higher education, law enforcement, public safety, and others, as determined by the office.

(4) "Eligible student" means a student who:

(a) Meets the definition of "resident student" under RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (e);

(b) Has a median family income of 100 percent or less of the state median family income;

(c) Is enrolled in an institution of higher education in an eligible graduate program on at least a half-time basis; and

(d) Has completed an annual application for financial aid as approved by the office.

(5) "Gift aid" means federal, state, institutional, or private financial aid provided for educational purposes with no obligation of repayment. "Gift aid" does not include student loans or work-study programs.

(6) "Institutions of higher education" includes institutions of higher education authorized to participate in state financial aid programs in accordance with chapter 28B.92 RCW.

(7) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance established under chapter 28B.76 RCW.

(8) "Program" means the Washington student loan program.

(9) "Student loan" means a loan that is approved by the office and awarded to an eligible student to pay for eligible expenses.

[ 2023 c 389 s 2; 2022 c 206 s 2.]